Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
CONVENTIONS - POLITICAL PARTY NOMINATIONS

1-4-701. Party nominations to be made by convention.

Any convention of delegates of a political party or any committee authorized by resolution of the convention may nominate candidates for vacancies to unexpired terms of representatives in congress and for presidential electors and also may select delegates to national political conventions.

The certificate of nomination shall contain the name of the office for which each person is nominated and the person's name and address and shall designate, in not more than three words, the political party which the convention or committee represents.

No certificate of nomination shall contain the names of more candidates for any office than there are offices to fill. If any certificate does contain the names of more candidates than there are offices to fill, only those names which come first in order on the certificate and are equally numbered with the number of offices to be filled shall be taken as nominated. No person shall sign more than one certificate of nomination for any office.

When the nomination is made by a committee, the certificate of nomination shall also contain a copy of the resolution passed at the convention which authorized the committee to make the nomination.

In the case of presidential electors, the names of the candidates for president and vice president may be added to the name of the political party in the certificate of nomination.

Certificates of nomination shall be received and filed with the secretary of state no later than sixty days before the general or congressional vacancy election.

Any person nominated in accordance with this section by any of the major political parties shall be deemed to have accepted the nomination unless the candidate files with the secretary of state a written declination of the nomination no later than four days after the adjournment of the convention. The declination may be transmitted by facsimile transmission no later than four days after the adjournment of the convention. If the declination is transmitted by facsimile transmission, the original declination must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the adjournment of the convention.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 329, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 248, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(4) amended, p. 1429, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 683, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 764, § 23, effective May 20.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 680, § 12, effective May 17.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to several former provisions of § 1-14-107 as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For methods of nomination, see §§ 1-4-502 and 1-4-503; for objections to nominations, see § 1-4-909.

1-4-702. Nominations of candidates for general election by convention.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a political party may choose to change from the nomination of candidates by primary election to the nomination of candidates by assembly or convention for all offices including, but not limited to, united states senator, representative in congress, all elective state, district, and county officers, and members of the general assembly if at least three-fourths of the total membership of the party's state central committee votes to use the assembly or convention nomination process; except that nominations by major political parties for candidates for lieutenant governor shall be made by the party's candidate for governor pursuant to section 1-4-502 (3). Such vote of the party central committee shall occur no later than October 1 of the year preceding the year in which an assembly or convention nominating process is to be used.

A political party nominating candidates by party assembly or convention shall nominate the candidates of the party and make such nominations public not later than seventy-five days before the general election.

Whichever method of candidate selection is chosen by a major political party as between primary election, assembly or convention, all of the candidates for that party at any level of office in that election year must be selected by such method, except that the requirements of this provision shall not apply to a primary for president of the united states if such an election is held.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire section added, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2823.

Editor's note:

This section was amended by initiative in 2016. The vote count on Proposition 108 at the general election held November 8, 2016, was as follows:

FOR: :u940 1,398,577

AGAINST: :u940 1,227,117

Cross references:

For the declaration of the people of Colorado in Proposition 108, see section 1 on p. 2822, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.